Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1050
Student, defined.

Student means a person engaged in the study of any or all of the practices of cosmetology or esthetics under the supervision of an instructor or esthetics instructor in a school of cosmetology or school of esthetics.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 29;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 13;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 15;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 23;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-368;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 312.